Illinois, session 104th, HB5776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Short-Term Rental Excise Tax Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.8    "Hosting platform" means a person who provides an online 9application, software, website, or system through which a 10short-term rental located in this State is advertised or held 11out to the public as available to rent for occupancy. 12    "Net revenue realized" means the revenue collected by the 13State under this Act, less the amount paid out as discounts 14under Section 40 and refunds to short-term rental operators 15for overpayment of liability under this Act.16    "Occupancy" means the use or possession, or the right to 17the use or possession, of any short-term rental for any 18purpose or the right to the use or possession of the 19furnishings or to the services and accommodations accompanying 20the use and possession of the short-term rental. 21    "Person" means any natural individual, firm, partnership, 22association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or 23private corporation, or limited liability company or any   HB5776- 2 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1receiver, executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative 2appointed by order of any court. 3    "Renter" means the lessee or tenant of a short-term 4rental. 5    "Rental price" means the gross amount of consideration for 6the occupancy of a short-term rental, valued in money, whether 7received in money or otherwise, including all receipts, cash, 8credits, and property or services of any kind or nature. 9"Rental price" includes any fee, charge, or commission 10received from a guest by a re-renter of short-term rentals 11specifically in connection with the re-rental of short-term 12rentals. 13    "Re-renter of short-term rentals" means a person who is 14not employed by the short-term rental operator but who, either 15directly or indirectly, through agreements or arrangements 16with third-parties, collects or processes the payment of rent 17for a short-term rental located in this State and (i) obtains 18the right or authority to grant control of, access to, or 19occupancy of a short-term rental in this State to a renter of 20the short-term rental or (ii) facilitates the booking of a 21short-term rental in this State. 22    "Short-term rental" means an owner-occupied, 23tenant-occupied, or non-owner-occupied dwelling, including, 24but not limited to, an apartment, house, cottage, or 25condominium, located in this State, where: (i) at least one 26room in the dwelling is rented to an occupant for a period of   HB5776- 3 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1less than 30 consecutive days; and (ii) all accommodations are 2reserved in advance; provided, however, that a dwelling shall 3be considered a single room if rented as such. 4    "Short-term rental marketplace" means a physical or 5electronic place, forum, platform, application, or other 6method by which short-term rental operators rent, lease, or 7let, or offer to rent, lease, or let, short-term rentals.8    "Short-term rental marketplace facilitator" means a person 9who, pursuant to agreements with unrelated third-party 10short-term rental operators, directly or indirectly through 11one or more affiliates, facilitates the renting, leasing, or 12letting of short-term rentals by unrelated third-party 13short-term rental operators by: 14        (1) listing or advertising short-term rentals for 15    rent, lease, or letting by short-term rental operators in 16    a short-term rental marketplace, the renting, leasing, or 17    letting of which is subject to tax under this Act; and 18        (2) collecting, either directly or indirectly, through 19    agreements or arrangements with third parties, payment 20    from renters and transmitting those payments to the 21    short-term rental operator, regardless of whether the 22    short-term rental marketplace facilitator receives 23    compensation or other consideration in exchange for its 24    services. 25    "Short-term rental marketplace facilitator" includes 26re-renters of short-term rentals and hosting platforms that   HB5776- 4 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1otherwise meet the definition of "short-term rental 2marketplace facilitator" set forth in this Section. 3    "Short-term rental operator" means any person engaged in 4the business of renting, leasing, or letting a short-term 5rental, including any person who rents, leases, or lets 6short-term rentals through a short-term rental marketplace 7operated by an unrelated third-party short-term rental 8marketplace facilitator.  9    Section 10. Rate; exemptions.10    (a) On and after January 1, 2027, a tax is imposed upon 11each renter for the privilege of renting, leasing, or letting 12a short-term rental in this State at the rate of 4% of the 13rental price of that short-term rental. The rental price shall 14not include taxes or charges that are added on account of the 15liability arising from this tax or any tax imposed by the State 16or any governmental agency on the occupation of renting, 17leasing, or letting or on the privilege of using short-term 18rentals or hotels, as defined in Section 2 of the Hotel 19Operators' Occupation Tax Act. The tax imposed under this Act 20shall be in addition to all other occupation or privilege 21taxes imposed by the State of Illinois or by any municipal 22corporation or political subdivision thereof.23    (b) The tax imposed by this Act shall be collected from the 24renter by the short-term rental operator and shall be remitted 25to the Department as provided in Section 40. Short-term rental   HB5776- 5 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1operators shall collect the tax from the renter by adding the 2tax to the charge for the act or privilege of renting, leasing, 3or letting a short-term rental in this State. The tax imposed 4by this Act shall, when collected, be stated as a distinct item 5separate and apart from the gross charge for renting, leasing, 6or letting a short-term rental. The tax imposed by this Act 7shall constitute a debt of the renter to the short-term rental 8operator who provides such taxable services until paid and, if 9unpaid, is recoverable at law in the same manner as the 10original charge for such taxable services. If the renting, 11leasing, or letting of a short-term rental is done through a 12short-term rental marketplace facilitator that has met the tax 13remittance threshold set forth in Section 15 of this Act, then 14the short-term rental marketplace facilitator is the 15short-term rental operator for the purposes of the taxes under 16this Act. 17    (c) The tax under this Act is not imposed upon the 18privilege of engaging in any business in interstate commerce 19or otherwise, which business may not, under the Constitution 20and statutes of the United States or under any federal treaty, 21be made the subject of taxation by this State. 22    (d) The tax imposed by this Act does not apply to the 23renting, leasing, or letting of short-term rentals by an 24entity that is organized and operated exclusively for 25religious purposes and that possesses an active Exemption 26Identification Number issued by the Department pursuant to the   HB5776- 6 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1Retailers' Occupation Tax Act if the renting, leasing, or 2letting is in furtherance of the purposes for which the exempt 3organization is organized. This subsection (d) is exempt from 4Section 20 of this Act. 5    (e) The tax imposed by this Act does not apply to the 6renting, leasing, or letting of short-term rentals by an 7entity that is organized and operated exclusively by an 8organization chartered by the United States Congress for the 9purpose of providing disaster relief and that possesses an 10active Exemption Identification Number issued by the 11Department pursuant to the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act if 12the renting, leasing, or letting is in furtherance of the 13purposes for which the exempt organization is organized. This 14subsection (e) is exempt from Section 20 of this Act. 15    (f) If any short-term rental operator collects an amount, 16however designated, that purports to be for the renter's tax 17liability measured by rental charges that are not subject to 18the short-term rental excise tax under this Act, or if any 19short-term rental operator, in collecting an amount, however 20designated, that purports to be for the renter's tax liability 21measured by rental charges which are subject to the short-term 22rental excise tax under this Act, collects more from the 23renter than the renter's short-term rental excise tax 24liability for the transaction is, the renter shall have a 25legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 26short-term rental operator. If that amount is not refunded to   HB5776- 7 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1the renter, for any reason, the short-term rental operator is 2liable to pay that amount to the Department. 3    Section 15. Short-term rental marketplace facilitators. 4    (a) A short-term rental marketplace facilitator meets the 5tax remittance threshold for purposes of this Act if, during 6the previous 12-month period, the cumulative gross rental 7receipts received by the short-term rental marketplace 8facilitator from the renting, leasing, or letting of 9short-term rentals on the facilitator's own behalf or on 10behalf of short-term rental operators, not including rental 11receipts exempt from the tax under subsections (d) and (e) of 12Section 10 of this Act, are greater than or equal to $100,000. 13A short-term rental marketplace facilitator who meets the tax 14remittance threshold and rents, leases, or lets Illinois 15short-term rentals to renters is subject to all applicable 16procedures and requirements of this Act. 17    A short-term rental marketplace facilitator shall 18determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the last day of 19March, June, September, and December, whether it meets the tax 20remittance threshold in this Section for the preceding 2112-month period. If the short-term rental marketplace 22facilitator meets the tax remittance threshold for a 12-month 23period, it is required to collect and remit the tax imposed 24under this Act and to file all applicable returns for one year. 25At the end of that one-year period, the short-term rental   HB5776- 8 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1marketplace facilitator shall determine whether it met the tax 2remittance threshold for the preceding 12-month period. If the 3short-term rental marketplace facilitator met the tax 4remittance threshold for the preceding 12-month period, it is 5required to continue to collect and remit the tax imposed 6under this Act and file returns for the subsequent year. If, at 7the end of a one-year period, a short-term rental marketplace 8facilitator that was required to collect and remit the tax 9imposed under this Act determines that it did not meet the tax 10remittance threshold during the preceding 12-month period, the 11short-term rental marketplace facilitator shall subsequently 12determine on a quarterly basis, ending on the last day of 13March, June, September, and December, whether it meets the tax 14remittance threshold for the preceding 12-month period. 15    A short-term rental marketplace facilitator that meets the 16tax remittance threshold shall be entitled to any credits, 17deductions, or adjustments to rental receipts otherwise 18provided to the short-term rental operator, in addition to any 19adjustments provided directly to the short-term rental 20marketplace facilitator, including, but not limited to, 21adjustments such as discounts, coupons, and rebates. In 22addition, a short-term rental marketplace facilitator is 23entitled to the discount provided in Section 40 of this Act on 24all short-term rental marketplace rentals, leases, or 25lettings, and the short-term rental operator shall not include 26rentals, leases, or lettings made through such a short-term   HB5776- 9 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1rental marketplace facilitator when computing any discount on 2remaining rentals, leases, or lettings. Short-term rental 3marketplace facilitators shall report and remit the applicable 4taxes under this Act on leases, rentals, or lettings 5facilitated for short-term rental operators separately from 6any taxes under this Act on taxable rentals, leases, or 7lettings made directly by the short-term rental marketplace 8facilitator or its affiliates.9    The short-term rental marketplace facilitator that meets 10the tax remittance threshold is liable for the remittance of 11all applicable taxes under this Act on rentals, leases, or 12lettings made through the short-term rental marketplace and is 13subject to audit on all of those rentals, leases, or lettings. 14The Department shall not audit short-term rental operators for 15their short-term rental marketplace rentals, leases, or 16lettings if the short-term rental marketplace facilitator 17remitted the applicable taxes under this Act unless the 18short-term rental marketplace facilitator seeks relief as a 19result of incorrect information provided to the short-term 20rental marketplace facilitator by a short-term rental operator 21as set forth in this Section. The short-term rental 22marketplace facilitator shall not be held liable for tax on 23any rentals, leases, or lettings made by a short-term rental 24operator that take place outside of the short-term rental 25marketplace and that are not a part of any agreement between a 26short-term rental marketplace facilitator and a short-term   HB5776- 10 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1rental operator. In addition, short-term rental marketplace 2facilitators shall not be held liable to the State of Illinois 3for having charged and remitted an incorrect amount of tax 4under this Act if, at the time of the rentals, leases, or 5lettings, the tax is computed based on erroneous data provided 6by the State on tax rates, boundaries, or taxing jurisdictions 7or incorrect information provided to the short-term rental 8marketplace facilitator by the short-term rental operator. 9    (b) A short-term rental marketplace facilitator that meets 10the tax remittance threshold shall: 11        (1) provide notice to each short-term rental operator 12    at the time of the agreement between the short-term rental 13    marketplace facilitator and short-term rental operator 14    that the short-term rental marketplace facilitator assumes 15    the rights and duties of a short-term rental operator 16    under this Act with respect to rentals, leases, or 17    lettings made by the short-term rental operator through 18    the short-term rental marketplace; 19        (2) certify, upon request, to the short-term rental 20    operator that the short-term rental marketplace 21    facilitator assumes the rights and duties of a short-term 22    rental operator under this Act with respect to rentals, 23    leases, or lettings made by the short-term rental operator 24    through the short-term rental marketplace; and 25        (3) collect and remit taxes imposed by this Act as 26    required by this Act for all rentals, leases, and lettings   HB5776- 11 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1    made through the short-term rental marketplace. 2    (c) For any rentals, leases, and lettings made through a 3short-term rental marketplace involving 2 or more parties that 4meet the definition of short-term rental marketplace 5facilitator, nothing in this Act shall prohibit those parties 6from making an agreement regarding which party shall be 7responsible for collecting and remitting taxes imposed by this 8Act, so long as the party so responsible is registered with the 9State for the purposes of remitting the taxes imposed by this 10Act. If the parties enter into an agreement described in this 11subsection, the party that agrees to collect and remit the 12taxes imposed by this Act shall be the sole party liable for 13the taxes imposed by this Act, and the other parties to the 14agreement are not liable for the tax. Any party subject to such 15an agreement must keep a copy of the agreement in its books and 16records and provide a copy to the Department upon request. 17    (d) A short-term rental marketplace facilitator is subject 18to audit on all short-term rental marketplace rentals, leases, 19and lettings for which it is the short-term rental operator 20but shall not be liable for tax or subject to audit on rentals, 21leases, or lettings made by short-term rental marketplace 22operators outside of the short-term rental marketplace. 23    (e) Nothing in this Act shall allow the Department to 24collect short-term rental excise taxes from both the 25short-term rental marketplace facilitator and the short-term 26rental operator on the same transaction.   HB5776- 12 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1    Section 20. Sunset of exemptions, credits, and deductions. 2The application of every exemption, credit, and deduction 3against the tax imposed by this Act shall be limited by a 4reasonable and appropriate sunset date. A taxpayer is not 5entitled to take the exemption, credit, or deduction beginning 6on the sunset date and thereafter. If a reasonable and 7appropriate sunset date is not specified in the Public Act 8that creates the exemption, credit, or deduction, a taxpayer 9shall not be entitled to take the exemption, credit, or 10deduction beginning 5 years after the effective date of the 11Public Act creating the exemption, credit, or deduction and 12thereafter. 13    Section 25. Books and records. Every short-term rental 14operator, every short-term rental marketplace facilitator that 15is required to collect and remit the tax under this Act, and 16every renter making direct tax payments to the Department 17under this Act, shall keep separate books or records of his 18business as a short-term rental operator or short-term rental 19marketplace facilitator so as to show the rents and 20occupancies taxable under this Act separately from his 21transactions that are not taxable under this Act. A short-term 22rental operator's books and records shall also include 23certificates provided by the short-term rental marketplace 24facilitator under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section   HB5776- 13 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b115 of this Act for all rentals, leases, and lettings made 2through a short-term rental marketplace in accordance with the 3requirements of this Act. If any short-term rental operator or 4short-term rental marketplace facilitator fails to keep such 5separate books or records, that short-term rental operator or 6short-term rental marketplace facilitator shall be liable for 7the tax at the rate designated in Section 10 of this Act upon 8the entire proceeds from the short-term rental operator's or 9short-term rental marketplace facilitator's business. The 10Department may adopt rules that establish requirements, 11including record forms and formats, for records required to be 12kept and maintained by short-term rental operators and 13short-term rental marketplace facilitators. For purposes of 14this Section, "records" means all data maintained by the 15short-term rental operator or short-term rental marketplace 16facilitator, including data on paper, microfilm, microfiche or 17any type of machine-sensible data compilation. 18    Section 30. Certificate of registration. It shall be 19unlawful for any person to engage in business as a short-term 20rental operator in this State without a certificate of 21registration from the Department. A certificate of 22registration issued to the short-term rental operator under 23the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act shall enable the 24person to engage in business as a short-term rental operator 25under this Act without the necessity of registering   HB5776- 14 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1separately.2    All of the provisions of Sections 2a and 2b of the 3Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, in effect on the effective date 4of this Act, as subsequently amended, shall apply to 5short-term rental operators to the same extent as if those 6provisions were included in this Act. 7    Section 35. Tax collected as debt owed to State. Any 8short-term rental operator required to collect the tax imposed 9by this Act shall be liable to the Department for the tax, 10whether or not the tax has been collected by the short-term 11rental operator, and any such tax shall constitute a debt owed 12by the short-term rental operator to this State. To the extent 13that a short-term rental operator required to collect the tax 14imposed by this Act has actually collected that tax, the tax is 15held in trust for the benefit of the Department. 16    Section 40. Returns. Except as otherwise provided in this 17Section, on or before the last day of each calendar month, 18every person engaged in business as a short-term rental 19operator in this State during the preceding calendar month 20shall file a return with the Department, stating: 21        (1) the name of the short-term rental operator; 22        (2) the short-term rental operator's residence 23    address, the address of the short-term rental operator's 24    principal place of business, and the address of the   HB5776- 15 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1    principal place of business (if that is a different 2    address) from which the short-term rental operator engages 3    in business as a short-term rental operator in this State 4    (including, if required by the Department, the address of 5    each short-term rental from which rental receipts were 6    received); 7        (3) the total amount of short-term rental receipts 8    received by the short-term rental operator during the 9    preceding calendar month; 10        (4) the total amount of exclusions from the short-term 11    rental excise tax allowed by this Act; 12        (5) the total amount of short-term rental excise tax 13    collected during the preceding calendar month from 14    renting, leasing, or letting short-term rentals during 15    such preceding calendar month; 16        (6) the amount of tax due; and 17        (7) such other reasonable information as the 18    Department may require. 19    If the short-term rental operator's average monthly tax 20collected and due to the Department does not exceed $200, the 21Department may authorize the short-term rental operator's 22returns to be filed on a quarter annual basis, with the return 23for January, February and March of a given year being due by 24April 30 of such year; with the return for April, May and June 25of a given year being due by July 31 of such year; with the 26return for July, August and September of a given year being due   HB5776- 16 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1by October 31 of such year, and with the return for October, 2November and December of a given year being due by January 31 3of the following year. 4    If the short-term rental operator's average monthly tax 5collected and due to the Department does not exceed $50, the 6Department may authorize the short-term rental operator's 7returns to be filed on an annual basis, with the return for a 8given year being due by January 31 of the following year. 9    Such quarter annual and annual returns, as to form and 10substance, shall be subject to the same requirements as 11monthly returns. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision in this Act concerning 13the time within which a short-term rental operator may file 14the short-term rental operator's return, in the case of any 15short-term rental operator who ceases to engage in a kind of 16business that makes the short-term rental operator responsible 17for filing returns under this Act, such short-term rental 18operator shall file a final return under this Act with the 19Department not more than one month after discontinuing such 20business. 21    Where the same person has more than one business 22registered with the Department under separate registrations 23under this Act, such person shall not file each return that is 24due as a single return covering all such registered 25businesses, but shall file separate returns for each such 26registered business.   HB5776- 17 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1    In the return, the short-term rental operator shall 2determine the value of any consideration other than money 3received by him in connection with engaging in business as a 4short-term rental operator and the short-term rental operator 5shall include such value in the short-term rental operator's 6return. Such determination shall be subject to review and 7revision by the Department in the manner provided for the 8correction of returns. 9    Where the short-term rental operator is a corporation, the 10return filed on behalf of such corporation shall be signed by 11the president, vice-president, secretary or treasurer or by 12the properly accredited agent of such corporation. 13    The person filing the return shall, at the time of filing 14the return, pay to the Department the amount of tax imposed and 15collected under this Act. The short-term rental operator 16filing the return shall, at the time of filing, pay to the 17Department the amount of tax collected under this Act less a 18discount of 2.1% or $25 per calendar year, whichever is 19greater, which is allowed to reimburse the short-term rental 20operator for the expenses incurred in keeping records, 21preparing and filing returns, remitting the tax and supplying 22data to the Department on request. 23    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 24short-term rental operator's liabilities under this Act, as 25shown on an original return, the Department may authorize the 26short-term rental operator to credit such excess payment   HB5776- 18 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1against liability subsequently to be remitted to the 2Department under this Act, in accordance with reasonable rules 3adopted by the Department. If the Department subsequently 4determines that all or any part of the credit taken was not 5actually due to the short-term rental operator, the short-term 6rental operator's discount shall be reduced by an amount equal 7to the difference between the discount as applied to the 8credit taken and that actually due, and that short-term rental 9operator shall be liable for penalties and interest on such 10difference. 11    If a short-term rental marketplace facilitator is required 12to collect and remit the tax under this Act, the provisions of 13this Section apply to the short-term rental marketplace 14facilitator as if the short-term rental marketplace 15facilitator had been the short-term rental operator. 16    Section 45. Incorporation of Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 17and Uniform Penalty and Interest Act. All of the provisions of 18Sections 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5i, 5j, 6, 6a, 6b, 196c, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 12 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 20and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act that 21are not inconsistent with this Act shall apply to the renting, 22leasing, or letting of short-term rentals in this State to the 23same extent as if such provisions were included in this Act. 24References in those incorporated Sections of the Retailers' 25Occupation Tax Act to retailers, sellers, or persons engaged   HB5776- 19 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1in the business of selling tangible personal property mean 2short-term rental operators. References in those incorporated 3Sections of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act to purchasers of 4tangible personal property mean renters of short-term rentals. 5References in those incorporated Sections of the Retailers' 6Occupation Tax Act to sales of tangible personal property mean 7the act or privilege of renting, leasing, or letting 8short-term rentals as defined in this Act.  9    Section 50. Allocation of proceeds. All of the net revenue 10realized from the tax imposed under this Act for the preceding 11month shall be deposited each month into the Community Land 12Trust Fund.  13    Section 55. Tax paid by renter. If a renter does not pay 14the tax imposed by this Act to a short-term rental operator or 15short-term rental marketplace facilitator, that renter shall 16file a return with the Department and pay the tax upon that 17portion of gross charges so paid to the short-term rental 18operator during the preceding calendar month no later than the 19last day of the month following that month. Those returns 20shall be filed on a form prescribed by the Department and shall 21contain such information as the Department may reasonably 22require. 23    If a renter pays a tax imposed by this Act directly to the 24Department, the Department (upon request from the renter)   HB5776- 20 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1shall issue an appropriate receipt to the renter showing that 2the renter has paid the tax to the Department. That receipt 3shall be sufficient to relieve the renter from further 4liability for the amount of tax to which such receipt may 5refer.6    If it appears that an amount of tax or penalty or interest 7under this Act has been paid in error to the Department by a 8renter, as distinguished from the short-term rental operator 9or short-term rental marketplace facilitator, whether such 10amount be paid through a mistake of fact or an error of law, 11that renter may file a claim for credit or refund with the 12Department. 13    Section 60. Penalties. Any short-term rental operator, 14short-term rental marketplace facilitator, or renter who fails 15to make a return, or who makes a fraudulent return, or who 16wilfully violates any other provision of this Act or any rule 17or regulation of the Department for the administration and 18enforcement of this Act, is guilty of a Class 4 felony. 19    Section 65. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 20to implement and administer this Act. The Department may adopt 21rules in accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure 22Act and prescribe forms relating to the administration and 23enforcement of this Act as it deems appropriate.   HB5776- 21 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1    Section 70. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act adopted. 2The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is hereby expressly 3adopted and shall apply to all administrative rules and 4procedures of the Department of Revenue under this Act, except 5that: (1) paragraph (b) of Section 501 of the Illinois 6Administrative Procedure Act does not apply to final orders, 7decisions and opinions of the Department; (2) subparagraph 8(a)2 of Section 5-10 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 9Act does not apply to forms established by the Department for 10use under this Act; and (3) the provisions of Section 10-45 of 11the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act regarding proposals 12for decisions are excluded and not applicable to the 13Department under this Act to the extent Section 10-45 applies 14to hearings not otherwise subject to the Illinois Independent 15Tax Tribunal Act of 2012. 16    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 17Sections 5.1038 and 6z-149 as follows: 18    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)19    Sec. 5.1038. The Community Land Trust Fund. 20    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)21    Sec. 6z-149. The Community Land Trust Fund; creation. The 22Community Land Trust Fund is created as a special fund in the 23State treasury. The Fund may accept moneys from any lawful   HB5776- 22 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1source. Any interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall be 2deposited into the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used by 3the Illinois Housing Development Authority for development, 4staffing, and capacity building and technical assistance 5related to community land trusts in the State. As used in this 6Section, "community land trust" has the meaning given to that 7term in the Community Land Trust Home Ownership Act. 8    Section 905. The Community Land Trust Home Ownership Act 9is amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 10    (310 ILCS 130/15)11    Sec. 15. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "501(c)(3) organization" means a nonprofit organization 13that is exempt or qualified for exemption from taxation under 14Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.15    "Community land trust" means a 501(c)(3) organization that 16has as its primary purposes the creation and maintenance of 17permanently affordable single-family or multifamily residences 18subject to all of the following criteria:19        (1) All single-family residences or multifamily 20    residences located on the land owned by the 501(c)(3) 21    organization or its wholly owned subsidiary must be 22    either:23            (A) sold to a buyer who is qualified under the 24        community land trust's program rules and occupied as   HB5776- 23 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1        the qualified buyer's primary residence; or2            (B) rented to a person or persons whose household 3        income does not exceed the maximum allowable gross 4        household income, as determined by the community land 5        trust, for that dwelling or unit.6        (2) Land that is owned by the 501(c)(3) organization 7    and that contains a single-family residence or multifamily 8    residence that is sold to a qualified buyer described in 9    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be leased to the 10    qualified buyer for the buyer's convenient occupation and 11    use, subject to a ground lease with affordability 12    restrictions, for a renewable term of 99 years for the 13    purpose of maintaining dwellings or units that are 14    permanently affordable.15        (3) In the case of dwellings or units that are part of 16    a condominium, cooperative, or other common interest 17    development and that are located on land that is owned by a 18    homeowners' association or a person other than the 19    community land trust, the condominium unit or interest 20    owned by the community land trust shall be sold to a 21    qualified buyer for the buyer's convenient occupation and 22    use, subject to a deed restriction or affordability 23    covenant that incorporates affordability restrictions for 24    a renewable term of at least 99 years and that is recorded 25    against the unit or interest for the purpose of 26    maintaining dwellings or units that are permanently   HB5776- 24 -LRB104 21738 HLH 37582 b1    affordable. governed by a board of community land trusts 2    residents, community residents, and public representatives 3    that provide permanent or long-term affordability and 4    shared equity homeownership opportunities.5(Source: P.A. 104-370, eff. 8-15-25.) 6    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.